th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ: เครื่องพ่นทราย; ทั่ง; ขวาน; ที่ไสไม้; สิ่วและสิ่วเซาะร่องสำหรับแกะสลัก; เครื่องมืออุดรอยรั่ว; แปรงปล่องไฟ; เครื่องบดอัดพื้น; คอมเพรสเซอร์; ไม้กวาดคอนกรีต; ที่ตัด; อุปกรณ์ลบคม; ดอลลี่และรถเข็นของ; เครื่องเจาะ; ลวดร้อยสายไฟสำหรับช่างไฟฟ้า; ไฟฉายแบบถือและสวมหัว; ปืนอัดจาระบี; เครื่องเจีย; ที่จับ; ค้อน; เครื่องผสมมือถือไฟฟ้า; คบไฟฮาร์ดแวร์; ปืนเป่าลมร้อน; บล็อกลม; เครื่องสั่นทางอุตสาหกรรม; กระจกตรวจสอบ; บันไดและนั่งร้าน; เครื่องกลึง; ตัวเปลี่ยนหลอดไฟ; ไฟแช็กและไม้ขีดไฟ; เครื่องผ่าท่อนไม้; เครื่องปัดกวาดแม่เหล็ก; เครื่องมือทำเครื่องหมาย; เครื่องมืองานปูน; พลั่ว; เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด; เครื่องมิลลิ่ง; เครื่องมือไฟฟ้าแบบหลายฟังก์ชัน; ที่ถอนตะปู; เครื่องยิงตะปูและเครื่องยิงแม็ก; ท่อกรองน้ำมัน; เครื่องมือทาสี; เครื่องมือหนีบจับ; เครื่องดัดท่อและบาร์; ที่ทำความสะอาดท่อและหลอด; แปรงสำหรับล้างท่อ; เครื่องไสไม้; กบไสไม้; คีม; ลูกสูบ; เครื่องขัดและเครื่องขัดเงา; เครื่องขุดหลุมเสา; ชะแลง; เครื่องเจาะและเหล็กปลายแหลม; เกรียงโป๊วและขูดสี; เครื่องคว้านรู; เครื่องมือหมุดย้ำ; เครื่องเซาะร่อง; เครื่องขัดกระดาษทราย; บล็อกกระดาษทราย; ม้าตั้งเลื่อยไม้; เลื่อย; ไขควง; เครื่องไส; เครื่องเหลา; ไขควงหัวบ็อกซ์; หัวแร้ง; ชุดซ่อมก๊อกน้ำ; เครื่องทำเกลียวตัวผู้และตัวเมีย; เครื่องทำเกลียว; แคลมป์และปากกาจับชิ้นงาน; ตะไบ; ชุดประแจ; มีดเครื่องมือ; ชุดของเครื่องมือ; เครื่องเชื่อม; ปืนเชื่อมและเครื่องตัดพลาสม่า; เครื่องมือตัดสายไฟและสายเคเบิล; ไฟสำหรับการทำงาน; ประแจ
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils: Sableuses; Enclumes; Haches; Dégauchisseuses; Burins et gouges pour sculpture; Outils de calfat; Brosses de cheminée; Compacteurs; Compresseurs; Balais à béton; Outils de coupe; Outils d’ébavurage; Diables et chariots de manutention; Perceuses; Tire-fils; Lampes de poche et lampes frontales; Pompes à graisse; Meuleuses; Poignées; Marteaux; Mélangeurs portatifs; Chalumeaux; Pistolets thermiques; Clés et tournevis à chocs; Vibrateurs industriels; Miroirs d’inspection; Échelles et échafaudages; Tours fraiseuses; Changeurs d’ampoules; Briquets et allumettes; Fendeuses de bûches; Balais magnétiques; Outils de traçage; Outils de maçonnerie; Haches et pioches; Outils de mesure et détecteurs; Fraiseuses; Outils électriques multi-usages; Arrache-clous; Cloueuses et agrafeuses; Systèmes de purge pour filtres à huile; Outils de peinture; Outils de ramassage; Plieuses de tuyaux et barres; Matériel de débouchage des canalisations; Brosses à tubes; Raboteuses; Rabots; Pinces; Ventouses; Polisseuses et lustreuses; Bêches tarières; Barres de levier; Poinçons et alènes; Spatules et grattoirs; Alésoirs; Outils de rivetage; Défonceuses; Ponceuses; Blocs de ponçage; Chevalet de sciage; Scies; Tournevis et visseuses; Burins de tournage; Aiguiseurs; Tournevis à douilles; Fers à souder; Rectifieuses de robinet; Tarauds; Machines à fileter; Serre-joints et étaux; Lime à outils; Clés de serrage; Couteaux-outils; Jeux d’outils; Soudeuses; Pistolets à souder et découpeurs plasma; Outils pour câbles et fils; Projecteurs de chantier; Clés
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты: Абразивоструйные аппараты; Наковальни; Топоры; Инструменты для фугования; Стамески; Инструменты для работы с герметиком; Щетка-ерши для чистки дымоходов; Уплотнители; Компрессоры; Щетки для бетона; Режущие инструменты; Инструменты для снятия заусенцев; Ручные тележки; Инструменты для сверления; Протяжки для кабеля; Фонари; Шприцы для смазки; Шлифовальные машины и станки; Рукоятки для инструментов; Молотки; Строительные миксеры; Горелки; Устройства для сушки; Ударные гайковерты, отвертки и шуруповерты; Промышленные вибраторы; Смотровые зеркала; Лестницы и строительные леса; Токарные станки; Устройства для замены лампочек; Зажигалки и спички; Дровоколы; Магнитные сборщики; Разметочные инструменты; Инструменты для кладки; Мотыги и кирки; Измерительные инструменты и датчики; Фрезерные станки; Многофункциональные электроинструменты; Гвоздодеры; Гвоздезабивные инструменты и степлеры; Приспособления для слива масла из фильтра; Малярные инструменты; Захватные устройства; Инструменты для гибки труб и арматуры; Инструменты для чистки труб; Ершики для чистки труб; Строгальные станки; Рубанки; Плоскогубцы и пассатижи; Вантузы; Полировальные машины; Буры для установки столбов; Монтировки; Шилья и пробойники; Шпатели и скребки; Развертки; Клепальные инструменты; Инструменты для фрезеровки; Шлифовальные машины; Шлифовальные колодки и блоки; Козлы для распиловки; Пилы и пильные станки; Отвертки; Фрезерные станки по дереву; Инструменты для заточки; Торцевые отвертки; Паяльники; Инструменты для притирки кранов; Метчики и плашки; Резьбонарезные станки; Тиски и струбцины; Напильники; Монтажные ключи; Монтажные ножи; Наборы инструментов; Сварочные аппараты; Сварочные горелки; Ручные инструменты для работы с проводами и кабелями; Фонари и прожекторы; Гаечные ключи
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili: Sabbiatrici; Incudini; Asce; Giunti per carpenteria; Ceselli e scalpellini per intaglio; Attrezzi da calafato; Spazzole per camini; Compattatori; Compressori; Scope calcestruzzo; Attrezzi per taglio; Sbavatori; Carrelli merci; Trapani; Fish tape per elettricisti; Torce tascabili e da testa; Pistole lubrificanti; Molatrici; Pinze manuali; Martelli; Miscelatori manuali; Torce elettriche; Pistole termiche; Avvitatori a impulsi; Vibratori per industria; Specchi di ispezione; Scale e ponteggi; Torni; Strumenti cambio lampadine; Accendini e fiammiferi; Spaccalegna; Elettromagneti da sollevamento; Attrezzi per marcatura; Attrezzi per muratura; Zappascuri e picconi; Strumenti/sensori misurazione; Fresatrici; Utensili elettrici multifunzione; Levachiodi; Sparachiodi e spillatrici; Scarichi per filtri dell'olio; Articoli per verniciatura; Attrezzi per raccogliere oggetti; Piegatubi e curvatubi; Pulizia tubi e condutture; Spazzole per tubi; Piallatrici; Pialle; Pinze da ferramenta; Stura scarichi; Lucidatrici e pulitrici; Foratrici per pali; Palanchini; Punzoni e punteruoli; Spatole e raschietti per stucco; Alesatori; Rivettatrici; Fresatrici verticali; Smerigliatrici; Tamponi per carteggiatura; Cavalletti (per legna); Seghe, seghetti; Cacciaviti; Limatrici; Affilatrici, temperamatite; Cacciaviti testa esagonale; Saldatori; Frese per rubinetti; Maschi filettatori e filiere; Filettatrici; Morse e morsetti; Utensile lime; Utensile Chiavi; Coltelli multiuso; Set di attrezzi; Saldatori; Saldatori a pistola e strumenti per taglio al plasma; Utensili per fili e cavi; Luci da lavoro; Chiavi
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje: Pískovačky; Kovadliny; Sekery; Srovnávačky; Řezbářské nástroje; Tužlíky; Komínové štětky; Lisy; Kompresory; Hladicí kartáče na beton; Střihací a řezací nástroje; Odstraňovače otřepů; Rudly a manipulační vozíky; Vrtačky; Elektrikářské protahovací pero; Svítilny a čelovky; Mazací pistole; Brusky; Svěrací kleště; Zatloukání; Ruční elektrické míchače; Hořáky; Horkovzdušné pistole; Rázové utahováky; Průmyslové vibrační stroje; Inspekční zrcátka; Žebříky a lešení; Soustruhy; Vyměňovače žárovek; Zapalovače a zápalky; Štípače dřeva; Zvedací magnety; Značkovací nástroje; Zednické nástroje; Krumpáče; Měřicí nástroje a přístroje; Frézovací stroje; Multifunkční elektrické nářadí; Vytahovače hřebíků; Hřebíkovačky a nastřelovací pistole; Pomůcky pro vypouštění oleje; Malířské nástroje; Prodloužené ruce; Ohýbačky tyčí a trubek; Čističe potrubí; Kartáče; Hoblovky; Hoblíky; Kleště; Zvony; Leštiče a čističe; Zahradní vrtáky; Páčidla; Děrovačky a šídla; Špachtle a škrabky; Výstružníky; Nástroje na nýtování; Frézky; Rovinné brusky; Brusné bloky; Kozy na řezání; Pily; Šroubováky; Obrážečky; Ostření; Nástrčné šroubováky; Pájky; Zabrušovače ventilů; Závitníky a závitnice; Závitovací stroje; Svorky a svěráky; Pořadače na nářadí; Nástrojové klíče; Pracovní nože; Sady nářadí; Svářečky; Svařovací pistole; Nástroje pro práci s dráty a kabely; Pracovní světla; Klíče
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok: Abrazív szórók; Üllők; Fejszék; Asztalos összekötők; Faragóvésők és vésők; Tömítőszerszámok; Kéménykefék; Tömörítők; Kompresszorok; Betonseprűk; Vágók; Sorjázók; Görgős kocsik és kézi kocsik; Fúrók; Villanyszerelő kábelbehúzó; Zseblámpák és fejlámpák; Zsírzópisztolyok; Csiszolók; Markolatok; Kalapácsok; Kézi elektromos keverők; Hardverlánghegy; Hőfegyverek; Ütköző csavarkulcsok és behajtók; Ipari rezgőkészülékek; Ellenőrzőtükrök; Létrák és állványzatok; Esztergagépek; Izzóváltók; Öngyújtók és gyufák; Rönkhasítók; Mágneses seprők; Jelölőeszközök; Falazószerszámok; Csákányok; Mérőeszközök és érzékelők; Marógépek; Többfunkciós elektromos szerszámok; Szögkihúzók; Szegezők és tűzők; Olajszűrő-lefolyók; Festőeszközök; Felszedőeszközök; Cső- és rúdhajlítók; Csőtisztítók; Csőkefék; Gyalugépek; Gyaluk; Fogók; Pumpák; Polírozók és fényesítők; Oszlopásók; Feszítővasak; Ütők és fúrószúrók; Glettkések és -kaparók; Dörzsárak; Szegecsszerszámok; Útválasztó szerszámok; Csiszolók; Csiszolóblokkok; Fűrészasztalok; Fűrészek; Csavarhúzók; Formázók; Élezők; Aljzatmeghajtók; Forrasztópákák; Fúró-visszahelyező; Menetvágók és menetfúrók; Menetvágó gépek; Szerszámbilincsek és satuk; Szerszámfájlok; Szerszámkulcsok; Szerszámkések; Szerszámkészletek; Hegesztők; Hegesztőpisztolyok és plazmavágók; Drótos és kábeles kéziszerszámok; Munkalámpák; Csavarkulcsok
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai: Smėliapūtės; Priekalai; Kirviai; Dailidžių frezeriai; Drožybos kaltai ir kirstukai; Sandarinimo įrankiai; Kaminų šepečiai; Tankintuvai; Kompresoriai; Betono šluotos; Pjovikliai; Atplaišų šalinimo įrankiai; Vežimėliai; Grąžtai; Laidų traukimo juosta; Žibintuvėliai ir ant galvos tvirtinami žibintuvėliai; Tepimo pistoletai; Šlifuokliai; Rankenos; Plaktukai; Rankiniai elektriniai maišytuvai; Degikliai; Kaitinimo pistoletai; Smūginiai veržliarakčiai ir atsuktuvai; Pramoniniai vibratoriai; Apžiūros veidrodėliai; Kopėčios ir pastoliai; Tekinimo staklės; Lempučių keitikliai; Žiebtuvėliai ir degtukai; Rąstų skaldytuvai; Magnetinės šlavimo mašinos; Žymėjimo įrankiai; Mūrijimo įrankiai; Kauptukai ir kirtikliai; Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai; Frezavimo staklės; Daugiafunkciniai elektriniai įrankiai; Viniatraukiai; Viniakaliai ir segikliai; Alyvos filtro išleidimo įrankiai; Dažymo įrankiai; Paėmimo įrankiai; Vamzdžių ir strypų lenktuvai; Vamzdžių valikliai; Vamzdžių šepečiai; Obliavimo staklės; Obliai; Replės; Santechninės pompos; Poliruokliai ir vaškavimo įrankiai; Kasimo įrankiai; Laužtuvai; Kerneriai ir ylos; Glaistymo peiliai ir grandikliai; Plėstuvai; Kniedijimo įrankiai; Frezavimo įrankiai; Medžio šlifuokliai; Medžio šlifavimo blokai; Pjovimo ožiai; Pjūklai; Atsuktuvai; Medžio frezavimo staklės; Galąstuvai; Lizdiniai atsuktuvai; Lituokliai; Maišytuvų keitimo įrankiai; Sriegpjovės ir sriegikliai; Sriegimo staklės; Veržtuvai ir spaustuvai; Įrankių dildės; Įrankių veržliarakčiai; Įrankių peiliai; Įrankių rinkiniai; Suvirinimo aparatai; Suvirinimo pistoletai ir plazminiai pjovikliai; Rankiniai įrankiai laidams ir kabeliams; Darbiniai žibintai; Veržliarakčiai
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具: 喷砂机; 铁砧; 斧子; 木榫; 雕刻工具; 填缝工具; 烟囱刷; 压实机; 压缩机; 水泥专用刷; 刀具; 去毛刺机; 小机车/手推车; 钻机; 电线穿线器; 手电筒/头灯; 黄油枪; 研磨机; 手柄; 锤子; 手持电动搅拌机; 五金喷火枪; 热风枪; 冲击扳手/起子; 工业振动器; 检查镜; 梯子/脚手架; 车床; 灯泡更换器; 打火机/火柴; 劈木机; 磁性扫地机; 划线工具; 砌体工具; 鹤嘴锄/镐锄; 测量工具与传感器; 铣床; 多功能角磨机; 起钉工具; 敲钉机/打钉机; 滤油器排油装置; 涂刷工具; 取物工具; 折弯机; 管道清洗器; 管刷; 木工压刨机; 刨子; 钳子; 柱塞; 磨光机/磨光器; 挖孔锹; 撬杠; 冲压机/尖钻; 油灰刮刀; 扩孔钻; 铆接工具; 铣具; 磨砂机; 磨块; 锯木架; 锯; 螺丝刀; 刨床; 磨具; 外六角螺丝刀/螺丝刀套筒; 焊铁; 阀座修整器; 丝锥与冲模; 攻丝机; 工装夹具; 打磨工具锉刀; 钥匙状小工具; 工具刀; 工具套装; 焊接机; 焊枪/等离子切割机; 电线/电缆工具; 投光灯/矿业工作灯; 扳手
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas: Jateadores de areia; Bigornas; Machados; Plainas; Ferramentas para entalhe; Ferramentas para calafetagem; Escovas para chaminé; Compactadores; Compressores; Vassouras para concreto; Cortadores; Máquinas de rebarbar; Carros e carrinhos de mão; Furadeiras; Fitas pescadoras; Lanternas e lanternas de cabeça; Pistolas de graxa; Esmerilhadeiras; Garras; Marteladores; Mixer de mão; Tochas de soldagem; Sopradores térmicos; Chaves inglesas e de impacto; Vibradores industriais; Espelhos de inspeção; Escadas e andaimes; Tornos; Trocadores de lâmpadas; Isqueiros e palitos de fósforo; Cortadores de lenha; Ímãs de levantamento; Ferramentas de marcação; Ferramentas para alvenaria; Enxadões e picaretas; Sensores e ferramentas para medição; Máquinas de fresar; Ferramentas elétricas multifuncionais; Alicates de unha; Máquinas de pregar e grampear; Drenos de filtros de óleo; Ferramentas para pintura; Ferramentas para recolher materiais; Entortadores de tubos; Limpadores de tubos e canos; Pincéis para canos; Plainas elétricas; Plainas manuais; Alicates; Pistões; Polidores; Escavadeiras para postes; Pés-de-cabra; Furadores; Espátulas e raspadores; Mandris; Ferramentas de rebites; Tupias; Lixadeiras; Suportes para lixas; Cavaletes para serrar madeira; Serras; Chaves de fenda; Moldadores; Afiadores; Chaves de porca; Ferros de solda; Ferramentas para refazer roscas; Machos e cossinetes; Máquinas de rosquear; Braçadeiras de ferramentas; Limas para ferramentas; Chaves para ferramentas; Estiletes; Conjuntos de ferramentas; Soldadores; Revólver de solda; Ferramentas para fios e cabos; Iluminação para trabalho; Chaves inglesas
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia: Piaskarki; Kowadła; Siekiery; Heblarki; Narzędzia snycerskie; Narzędzia do uszczelniania; Szczotki do komina; Ubijaki; Kompresory; Szczotki do betonu; Przecinaki; Gratowniki; Wózki ręczne; Wiertarki; Taśma perlonowa; Latarki i czołówki; Smarownice; Młynki; Uchwyty; Wbijanie; Mieszarki ręczne; Palniki; Opalarki; Wkrętarki udarowe; Wibratory przemysłowe; Lusterka inspekcyjne; Drabiny i rusztowania; Tokarki; Zmieniacze żarówek; Zapalniczki i zapałki; Rozdrabniacze do drewna; Magnesy podnoszące; Narzędzia znakujące; Narzędzia murarskie; Motyki i kilofy; Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki; Frezarki; Elektronarzędzia wielofunkcyjne; Wyciągacze gwoździ; Gwoździarki i zszywacze; Odpływy filtrów oleju; Narzędzia malarskie; Narzędzia do chwytania; Zginacze do rur i prętów; Urządzenia do czyszczenia rur; Szczotki do rur; Strugarki wzdłużne; Heble; Kombinerki; Przepychacze; Polerki i froterki; Świdry ziemne; Łomy stalowe; Dziurkacze i przebijaki; Szpachle i skrobaki; Rozwiertaki; Narzędzia do nitowania; Narzędzia do frezowania pionowego; Piaszczarki; Klocki do szlifowania; Koziołki do cięcia drewna; Piły; Śrubokręty; Strugarki poprzeczne; Ostrzałki; Śrubokręty nasadkowe; Lutownice; Urządzenia do naprawy kranów; Gwintowniki i narzynki; Maszyny do nacinania gwintu; Zaciski i imadła narzędziowe; Pilniki narzędziowe; Klucze narzędziowe; Noże narzędziowe; Zestawy narzędzi; Spawarki; Narzędzia do spawania; Przewodowe narzędzia ręczne; Lampy robocze; Klucze
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas: Jateadores abrasivos; Bigornas; Machados; Desempenadeiras; Formões e cinzéis; Ferramentas de calafetagem; Escovas limpa-chaminés; Compactadores; Compressores; Vassouras para betão; Alicates/cortadores; Removedores de rebarbas; Plataformas móveis e carrinhos de mão; Berbequins; Cabo de eletricista; Lanternas e lanternas de cabeça; Bombas de lubrificação; Esmeris; Grampos; Martelos; Misturadoras manuais; Maçaricos; Sopradores de ar quente; Berbequins e chaves de impacto; Vibradores industriais; Espelhos de inspeção; Escadas e andaimes; Tornos; Trocadores de lâmpadas; Isqueiros e fósforos; Rachador de lenha; Varredores magnéticos; Ferramentas para marcação; Ferramentas para alvenaria; Enxadas e picaretas; Ferramentas e sensores de medição; Fresadoras; Ferramentas elétricas multiuso; Turqueses; Pregadoras e agrafadores; Drenos de filtro de óleo; Ferramentas de pintura; Ferramentas de recolha; Curvador de tubos e barras; Limpadores de tubos e barras; Escovas helicoidais; Plainas; Desbastadores; Alicates; Desentupidores; Polidores e esmeris; Perfuradores do solo; Alçapremas; Ponteiros e furadores; Espátulas e raspadores; Mandris; Ferramentas de rebitagem; Tupias; Lixadoras; Blocos de lixagem; Cavaletes; Serras; Chaves de parafuso; Máquina de acabamento para madeira; Afias; Pegas para chaves de caixa; Ferros de soldar; Retificadores de torneiras; Machos e caçonetes; Máquinas de roscar; Grampos e tornos; Limas de ferramentas; Jogos de chaves; X-atos/canivetes; Conjuntos de ferramentas; Soldadores; Pistolas de soldar e cortadoras de plasma; Ferramentas manuais para fios e cabos; Iluminação de trabalho; Chaves
ko: 철물 > 도구: 연마제 분사기; 모루; 도끼; 목공 접합기; 조각용 끌/둥근끌; 코킹 도구; 굴뚝 솔; 콤팩터; 압축기; 콘크리트 마무리용 빗자루; 절단기; 디버링기; 짐수레/손수레; 드릴; 피시 테이프; 손전등/헤드램프; 그리스 주입기; 그라인더; 그립; 망치; 휴대용 전동 혼합기; 토치; 열선총; 임팩트 렌치/드라이버; 공업용 진동기; 검사경; 사다리/비계; 선반 기계; 백열전구 교체기; 점화기/성냥; 나무 절단기; 자석 청소기; 마킹 도구; 미장 도구; 넓은날 골괭이/곡괭이; 측정 도구/센서; 밀링 머신; 다기능 전동 공구; 장도리; 네일러/스테이플러; 오일 필터 배수관; 페인트 공구; 가제트팔 도구; 파이프/바 벤더; 파이프/튜브 세척기; 파이프 솔; 전동 대패; 대패; 펜치; 플런저; 광택기/버퍼; 굴혈 장비; 지렛대; 펀치/송곳; 퍼티 나이프/스크레이퍼; 확공기; 리벳 도구; 라우팅 도구; 전기 사포; 샌딩 블록; 톱질 모탕; 톱; 드라이버; 셰이퍼; 샤프너; 소켓 드라이버; 납땜 인두; 탭 리시터; 탭/다이; 나사절삭기; 도구 죔쇠/바이스; 다듬기 파일; 공구 열쇠; 공구 칼; 공구 세트; 용접기; 용접 건/플라스마 절단기; 전선/케이블 수공구; 작업등; 렌치
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler: Kumlama Makineleri; Örsler; Baltalar; Rendeler; Oyma Aletleri; Kalafat Aletleri; Baca Temizlik Fırçaları; Sıkıştırıcılar; Kompresörler; Beton Süpürgeleri; Kesiciler; Çapak Alıcılar; Kaydırma Arabaları ve El Arabaları; Matkaplar; Elektrikçi Kılavuz Telleri; El ve Kafa Fenerleri; Yağ Tabancaları; Taşlama Makineleri; Saplar; Çekiçler; Motorlu El Karıştırıcıları; Üfleçler; Isı Tabancaları; Darbeli Anahtar ve Vidalamalar; Endüstriyel Vibratörler; İnceleme Aynaları; Merdivenler ve Yapı İskeleleri; Torna Tezgahları; Ampul Değiştiriciler; Çakmaklar ve Kibritler; Odun Yarma Makineleri; Kaldırma Mıknatısları; İşaretleme Aletleri; Duvarcı Aletleri; Çapalar ve Kazmalar; Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler; Freze Makineleri; Çok İşlevli Elektrikli Aletler; Çivi Sökme Aletleri; Çivi Çakıcılar ve Zımbalar; Yağ Filtresi Drenleri; Boya Aletleri; Tutma Aletleri; Boru Bükücüler; Boru Temizleyiciler; Boru Temizleme Fırçaları; Planya Makineleri; Planyalar; Kerpetenler; Dalıcı Pistonlar; Cilalayıcılar ve Perdahlayıcılar; Direk Çukuru Kazıcılar; Manivelalar; Delgiler ve Bizler; Ispatulalar ve Raspalar; Raybalar; Perçinleme Aletleri; Yönlendirme Aletleri; Zımpara Makineleri; Zımpara Blokları; Testere Tezgahları; Testereler; Tornavidalar; Vargeller; Bileyiciler; Lokma Uçlu Tornavidalar; Lehim Aletleri; Musluk Göbeği Yenileme Aletleri; Kılavuz Pafta Setleri; Yiv Açma Makineleri; Alet Mengeneleri; Alet Eğeleri; Alet Anahtarları; Alet Bıçakları; Alet Takımları; Kaynak; Kaynak Tabancaları ve Plazma Kesme Aletleri; Tel ve Kablo El Aletleri; Çalışma Lambaları; Somun Anahtarları
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja: Stroji za peskanje; Nakovala; Sekire; Lesarski skobljiči; Dleta in vdolbna dleta za rezbarjenje; Orodje za tesnjenje; Ščetke za čiščenje dimnika; Stiskalnice; Kompresorji; Metle za beton; Rezalniki; Razigljevalci; Nosilni vozički in ročni transportni vozički; Vrtalniki; Vlečni trakovi za kable; Baterijske svetilke in žarometi; Mazalne pištole; Brusilniki; Ročaji; Kladiva; Ročni mešalniki z električnim pogonom; Plamenski rezalniki; Toplotne pištole; Udarni ključi in gonilniki; Industrijski vibratorji; Inšpekcijska ogledala; Lestve in gradbeni odri; Stružnice; Menjalniki žarnic; Vžigalniki in vžigalice; Cepilniki drv; Magnetni pometalniki; Orodja za označevanje; Zidarska orodja; Motike in krampi; Merilna orodja in senzorji; Rezkalni stroji; Večnamenska električna orodja; Orodje za odstranjevanje žebljev; Žebljalniki in spenjalniki; Ključi za oljne filtre; Orodja za barvanje; Orodja za pobiranje; Upogibniki cevi in kovinskih palic; Čistila za cevi in cevovode; Ščetke za čiščenje cevi; Skobeljniki; Obliči; Klešče; Odmaševalniki odtokov; Polirniki in brusilniki; Kopači lukenj za stebre; Lomilke; Izbijači in šila; Gladilke in strgala; Rezkarji; Orodja za kovičenje; Orodja za rezkanje; Brusilniki; Brusni bloki; Žagini listi; Žage; Izvijači; Pehalni stroji; Brusilniki; Pogonski nastavki; Spajkalniki; Orodje za ponastavitev pip; Navojni svedri in matice; Stroji za vrezovanje navojev; Objemke in primeži za orodje; Pile za orodje; Orodni ključi; Orodni noži; Kompleti orodja; Varilni aparati; Varilne pištole in plazemski rezalniki; Ročno orodje za žice in kable; Delovne luči; Ključi
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte: Dispozitive de sablare abrazive; Nicovale; Topoare; Rindea de tâmplărie; Dălți și dălți concave; Scule de călăfătuire; Perii pentru hornuri; Compactoare; Compresoare; Mături pentru beton; Dispozitive pentru tăiat; Debavuratoare; Cărucioare și cărucioare de mână; Burghie; Bandă electrician; Lanterne și lămpi pentru cască; Pompă de gresat; Polizoare; Mânere; Ciocane; Mașini de amestecat portabile; Arzătoare; Pistoale de căldură; Chei și elemente de acționare pneumatice; Vibratoare industriale; Oglinzi pentru inspecție; Scări și schele; Strunguri; Dispozitive pentru schimbat becuri; Brichete și chibrituri; Despicătoare de bușteni; Mături magnetice; Scule pentru marcare; Unelte de zidărie; Sape late și târnăcoape; Instrumente de măsură și senzori; Mașini de frezat; Unelte electrice multifuncționale; Clește de cuie; Pistoale de împușcat cuie și capsatoare; Scurgeri filtru de ulei; Instrumente pentru vopsit; Unelte de ridicare; Dispozitive pentru îndoit țevi și bare; Dispozitive pentru curățat țevi și tuburi; Perii pentru țevi; Mașină de rindeluit; Rindea; Clești; Pompe de desfundat; Polizoare și discuri de lustruit; Excavatoare găuri pentru stâlpi; Răngi; Perforatoare și ace de trasare; Cuțite și raclete pentru chit; Alezoare; Instrumente de nituire; Unelte de rindeluire; Unelte de șlefuire; Blocuri pentru șlefuire; Capre; Ferăstraie; Șurubelnițe; Cuțite de rabotat; Dispozitive de ascuțit; Chei tubulare; Ciocane de lipit; Dispozitive pentru recondiționare robinete; Dornuri și matrițe; Mașini de filetat; Cleme și menghine pentru scule; Pile pentru scule; Chei pentru scule; Cuțite pentru scule; Seturi de scule; Dispozitive de sudură; Pistoale de sudură și tăietoare cu plasmă; Unelte de mână pentru sârmă și cablu; Sisteme de iluminat pentru lucru; Chei
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ: Máy phun mài mòn; Đe; Rìu; Bào thợ mộc; Thiết bị khắc & chạm trổ; Dụng cụ trét; Chổi cọ ống khói; Máy đầm; Máy nén; Chổi quét sàn xi măng; Thiết bị cắt; Dụng cụ cắt gọt; Xe kéo & Xe đẩy tay; Máy khoan; Thước cuộn điện; Đèn pin & đèn đội đầu; Súng tra mỡ; Máy mài; Kẹp; Búa; Máy trộn bằng điện cầm tay; Đuốc/ đèn khò kim loại; Súng bắn nhiệt; Máy vặn bu lông & Đầu vít; Máy rung công nghiệp; Gương kiểm định; Thang & Giàn giáo; Máy tiện; Dụng cụ thay bóng đèn; Bật lửa & Hộp diêm; Máy tách gỗ; Chổi nam châm; Dụng cụ đánh dấu; Dụng cụ nề; Cuốc chim & Cái cuốc; Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến; Máy phay; Bộ dụng cụ điện đa năng; Dụng cụ nhổ đinh; Tấm đệm đóng đinh & Máy dập ghim; Ống lọc dầu; Dụng cụ sơn; Dụng cụ gắp vật rơi; Máy uốn ống & thanh; Thiết bị làm sạch ống và ống dẫn; Bàn chải ống; Máy bào gỗ; Máy bay; Kìm; Chốt đẩy; Dụng cụ đánh bóng & Giảm chấn; Dụng cụ đào lỗ; Thanh bẩy; Kìm bấm & Dùi; Dao trát ma-tít & Dao nạo; Mũi dao; Dụng cụ tán đinh; Dụng cụ bào soi; Máy đánh giấy ráp; Dụng cụ chà nhám; Bàn cưa; Cưa; Tua vít; Khuôn; Dụng cụ mài; Đầu tuýp; Mỏ hàn; Dụng cụ siết lại đai ốc vòi nước; Bàn ren & ta rô; Máy cắt ren; Ngàm kẹp dụng cụ; Giũa; Chìa vặn; Dao xếp đa năng; Bộ dụng cụ; Máy hàn; Súng hàn & Máy cắt bằng plasma; Dụng cụ cầm tay dây & cáp; Đèn lao động; Cờ lê
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy: Sandblåsere; Ambolter; Økser; Freser; Meisler og -dor; Tettingsverktøy; Pipebørster; Komprimatorer; Kompressorer; Betongkoster; Kuttere; Gradverktøy; Dollier og håndtraller; Driller; Elektrikerslange; Lommelykter og hodelykter; Fettpistoler; Slipemaskiner; Grep; Hammere; Håndholdte elektriske blandere; Lykter; Varmepistoler; Muttertrekkere og -drivere; Industrelle vibratorer; Inspeksjonsspeil; Stiger og stillaser; Dreiebenker; Lyspæreskiftere; Lightere og fyrstikker; Vedkløyvere; Magnetiske feieapparater; Markeringsverktøy; Murerverktøy; Hakker; Måleverktøy og sensorer; Fresemaskiner; Elektriske multifunksjonsverktøy; Spikeruttrekkere; Spikerpistoler og stiftemaskiner; Oljefilteravløp; Maleverktøy; Gripeverktøy; Rør- og stangbøyere; Rørrensere; Rørbørster; Høvler; Håndhøvler; Tenger; Sugekopper; Pusseredskaper og poleringsskiver; Stolpeskruer; Brekkjern; Syler; Sparkler og skraper; Opprømmingsbor; Nagleverktøy; Rutingsverktøy; Pussere; Pusseblokker; Sagekrakker; Sager; Skrutrekkere; Metallhøvler; Spissere; Pipetrekker; Loddebolt; Tetningsverktøyer; Gjengesett; Gjengemaskiner; Verktøyklemmer og skrustikker; Verktøyfiler; Verktøynøkler; Verktøykniver; Verktøysett; Sveiseapparater; Sveisepistoler og plasmakuttere; Håndverktøy for ledninger og kabler; Arbeidslys; Nøkkelverktøy
da: Isenkram > Redskaber: Sandblæsere; Ambolte; Økser; Afrettere – snedker; Træskærerjern; Stemmeværktøjer; Skorstensbørster; Komprimeringsmaskiner; Kompressorer; Betonkoste; Arbejdssakse; Afgratere; Sækkevogne og pakkevogne; Bor; Elektrikerens fangsnor; Lygter; Smørepistoler; Slibemaskiner; Greb; Hammere; Håndholdt cement- og malingsblander; Fakler; Varmepistoler; Slagskruenøgler; Vibratorer til industribrug; Inspektionsspejle; Stiger og stilladser; Drejebænke; Pæreskiftere; Lightere og tændstikker; Brændeflækkere; Løftemagneter; Markeringsværktøjer; Mureværktøj; Ryddehakker og hakker; Måleredskaber og -sensorer; Fræsemaskiner; Multifunktionelle værktøjer; Knibtange; Sømsmede og hæftemaskiner; Dræn til oliefiltre; Maleredskaber; Opsamlingsværktøjer; Bukkemaskiner; Slangerensere; Rørbørster; Høvlemaskiner; Høvle; Tænger; Svuppere; Polerværktøjer og polerskiver; Stolpebor; Brækjern; Stansemaskiner og syle; Spatler og skrabejern; Rømmejern; Nitteværktøjer; Fræseværktøjer; Sandpapirmaskiner; Pudseklodser; Savbukke; Save; Skruetrækkere; Shapere; Slibeværktøjer; Topnøgler; Loddekolber; Fræsebits; Gevindskæresæt; Trådningsmaskiner; Skruetvinger; Værktøjsfiler; Værktøjsnøgler; Værktøjsknive; Værktøjssæt; Svejsere; Svejsepistoler; Håndværktøjer til ledninger og kabler; Arbejdslamper; Skruenøgler
en: Hardware > Tools: Abrasive Blasters; Anvils; Axes; Carpentry Jointers; Carving Chisels & Gouges; Caulking Tools; Chimney Brushes; Compactors; Compressors; Concrete Brooms; Cutters; Deburrers; Dollies & Hand Trucks; Drills; Electrician Fish Tape; Flashlights & Headlamps; Grease Guns; Grinders; Grips; Hammers; Handheld Power Mixers; Hardware Torches; Heat Guns; Impact Wrenches & Drivers; Industrial Vibrators; Inspection Mirrors; Ladders & Scaffolding; Lathes; Light Bulb Changers; Lighters & Matches; Log Splitters; Magnetic Sweepers; Marking Tools; Masonry Tools; Mattocks & Pickaxes; Measuring Tools & Sensors; Milling Machines; Multifunction Power Tools; Nail Pullers; Nailers & Staplers; Oil Filter Drains; Paint Tools; Pickup Tools; Pipe & Bar Benders; Pipe & Tube Cleaners; Pipe Brushes; Planers; Planes; Pliers; Plungers; Polishers & Buffers; Post Hole Diggers; Pry Bars; Punches & Awls; Putty Knives & Scrapers; Reamers; Riveting Tools; Routing Tools; Sanders; Sanding Blocks; Saw Horses; Saws; Screwdrivers; Shapers; Sharpeners; Socket Drivers; Soldering Irons; Tap Reseaters; Taps & Dies; Threading Machines; Tool Clamps & Vises; Tool Files; Tool Keys; Tool Knives; Tool Sets; Welders; Welding Guns & Plasma Cutters; Wire & Cable Hand Tools; Work Lights; Wrenches
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap: Zandstralers; Aambeelden; Bijlen; Houtschaven; Houtsnijgereedschap; Breeuwgereedschappen; Schoorsteenvegers; Persen; Compressors; Betonbezems; Snijwerktuigen; Ontbramers; Rijdende plateaus en handkarren; Boren; Trekveer voor elektricien; Zaklantaarns en hoofdlampen; Vetspuiten; Slijpers; Handgrepen; Timmeren; Electrische handmengers; Branders; Hittepistolen; Slagmoersleutels; Industriële vibreermachines; Inspectiespiegels; Ladders en bouwsteigers; Draaibanken; Gloeilampverwisselaars; Aanstekers en lucifers; Houtklovers; Hefmagneten; Markeermiddelen; Benodigdheden voor metselen; Houwelen en pikhouwelen; Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren; Freesmachines; Multifunctionele elektrische apparaten; Spijkertrekkers; Spijker- en nietpistolen; Systemen voor het leeghalen van oliefilters; Verfbenodigdheden; Tilgereedschap; Buigtangen; Buis- en leidingreinigers; Pijpenrager; Schaafmachines; Schaven; Grijptangen; Ontstoppers; Poets- en polijstmachines; Grondboren; Koevoeten; Priemen en ponsen; Plamuurmessen en -schapers; Ruimers; Klinkgereedschappen; Bovenfrees; Schuurmachines; Schuurblokken; Zaagbokken; Zagen; Schroevendraaiers; Freesbanken; Slijpmachines; Moerdraaiers; Soldeerbouten; Draadtap voor kranen; Draadtappen en -snijplaten; Draadsnijmachines; Werkstukklemmen; Vijlen; Sleutels voor gereedschap; Snijgereedschap; Gereedschapsets; Lassers; Laspistolen; Draad- en kabelgereedschappen; Werklicht; Moersleutels
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具: 噴砂機; 鐵砧; 斧; 木工接合器; 鑿刀和圓鑿; 填隙工具; 煙囪刷具; 壓實機; 壓縮機; 水泥用刷子; 刀具; 去毛邊器; 台車/手推平車; 鑽孔機; 電工漁線; 手電筒/頭燈; 油槍; 磨床; 握柄; 槌子; 手持攪拌器; 瓦斯燈燈柱; 加熱槍; 棘輪扳手和起子; 工業用振動器; 檢視鏡; 梯子和鷹架; 車床; 換燈泡工具; 打火機和火柴; 劈木機; 磁力清掃機; 標記工具; 泥作工具; 十字鎬/十字鍬; 測量工具和感測器; 銑床; 多功能電動工具; 拔釘器; 釘槍; 濾油器導管; 油漆工具; 取物工具; 配管/金屬條折彎機; 水管疏通工具; 管刷; 刨木機; 鉋刀; 鉗; 吸把; 拋光機/緩衝器; 土地鑽孔機; 鐵撬; 沖孔機/鑽孔機; 刮刀和補土刀; 鉸刀; 鉚接工具; 路達工具; 砂光機; 研磨砂塊; 鋸木檯; 鋸子; 螺絲起子; 刨床; 削尖器; 套筒扳手; 銲鐵; 水龍頭修整器; 螺絲攻和螺模; 螺紋機; 鉗夾/虎鉗; 銼刀; 多功能鑰匙; 工具刀; 工具組; 焊接機; 焊槍和電漿切割機; 手動纜線切割工具; 工作燈; 扳手
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje: Pieskovačky; Nákovy; Sekery; Tesárske vyrovnávacie frézky; Rezbárske dláta; Nástroje na tmelenie; Komínové kefy; Lisy; Kompresory; Metly na betón; Kliešte; Odhrotovače; Prívesy a ručné vozíky; Vŕtačky; Elektrikárske preťahovacie pero; Baterky a čelovky; Mazacie pištole; Brúsky; Rukoväte; Kladivá; Ručné elektrické miešadlá; Kovové baterky; Teplomety; Rázové skrutkovače a uťahováky; Priemyselné vibrátory; Inšpekčné zrkadlá; Rebríky a lešenia; Sústruhy; Meniče žiaroviek; Zapaľovače a zápalky; Štiepačky dreva; Magnetické metly; Značkovacie nástroje; Murárske náradie; Motyky a krompáče; Meracie nástroje a snímače; Frézky; Multifunkčné elektrické náradie; Vyťahovače klincov; Klincovačky a zošívačky; Odtokové nádrže olejového filtra; Nástroje na maľovanie; Zberače; Ohýbačky rúr a tyčí; Čističe rúr a hadíc; Kefy na rúry; Hobľovačky; Hoblíky; Kliešte; Inštalatérske zvony; Leštičky a pufre; Rýpadlá; Tyče s hákom; Dierovačky a šidlá; Špachtle a stierky; Výstružníky; Nitovacie nástroje; Ručné frézky; Brúsky; Brúsne bloky; Pracovné kozy; Píly; Skrutkovače; Obrážačky; Brúsky; Nástrčné kľúče; Spájkovačky; Závitníky na vodovodné batérie; Súpravy na rezanie závitov; Závitovacie stroje; Svorky a zveráky na náradie; Pilníky; Sady kľúčov; Sady nožíkov; Sady nástrojov; Zváračky; Zváracie pištole a plazmové rezačky; Ručné náradie na vodiče a káble; Pracovné svetlá; Kľúče
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти: Пясъкоструйки; Наковални; Брадви; Абрихт машини; Длета за дърворезба и издълбаване; Инструменти за уплътняване; Четки за комини; Трамбовки; Компресори; Метли за бетон; Резачки; Машини за премахване на ръбове; Колички и ръчни колички; Бормашини; Пружина за изтегляне на кабели; Фенери и челници; Пистолети за гресиране; Машини за шлайфане; Стяги; Чукове; Бъркалки за строителни смеси; Заваръчни горелки; Топлинни пистолети; Ударни гайковерти и винтоверти; Индустриални вибратори; Огледала за преглед; Стълби и скелета; Стругове; Устройства за смяна на ел. крушки; Запалки и кибрит; Машини за цепене на дърва; Магнитни метли; Инструменти за маркиране; Инструменти за зидария; Мотики и кирки; Измервателни инструменти и сензори; Фрезови машини; Многофункционални електрически инструменти; Инструменти за вадене на пирони; Пирони и телбоди; Дренажи за маслен филтър; Инструменти за боядисване; Инструменти за хващане; Тръбогиби; Уреди почистване на тръби; Четки за тръби; Щрайхмус машини; Рендета; Клещи; Вакуум помпи за отпушване; Машини за полиране; Свредла за пробиване на дупки; Щанги тип „кози крак“; Инструменти за дупчене и шила; Шпакли и стъргалки; Райбери; Инструменти за нитоване; Инструменти за фрезови машини; Шлайфмашини; Шлифовъчни блокчета; Стойки за рязане тип „магаре“; Триони; Отвертки; Фрези за дърво; Точила; Отвертки за битове; Поялници; Инструменти за ремонт на кранове; Метчици и плашки; Резбонарязващи машини; Стяги и менгемета; Пили; Ключове; Ножове; Комплекти инструменти; Заваръчни апарати; Пистолети за заваряване и плазмени резачки; Ръчни инструменти за жици и кабели; Работни светлини; Гаечни ключове
ja: DIY用品 > 工具: サンドブラスター; 金床; 斧; 手押しカンナ; 彫刻・カービング用具; コーキング用具; 煙突用ブラシ; コンパクター; コンプレッサー; コンクリートブラシ; カッター; バリ取り機; 台車・手押し車; ドリル; フィッシュテープ; 懐中電灯・ヘッドランプ; グリースガン; グラインダー; グリップ; ハンマー・電動ハンマー; 撹拌機; トーチ・バーナー; ヒートガン; インパクトレンチ・インパクトドライバー; 工業用振動モーター; 点検ミラー; はしご・足場; 旋盤; ランプチェンジャー; ライター・マッチ; 薪割機; リフティングマグネット; マーキング用品; 左官・舗装用ツール; マトック・つるはし; 測定機器・センサー; フライス盤; マルチ電動工具; 釘抜き; 釘打機; オイルフィルタードレン; 塗装用品; ピックアップツール; パイプベンダー; パイプ清掃器具; パイプブラシ; 電気カンナ; カンナ; ペンチ; ラバーカップ; ポリッシャー・バッファー; 穴掘り機・複式ショベル; バール; パンチ・千枚通し; スクレイパー・へら; リーマー; リベット工具; ルーター (工具); サンダー; サンディングブロック; ソーホース; のこぎり; ドライバー; シェーパー; シャープナー; ナットドライバー; ハンダゴテ; 蛇口修復ツール; タップ・ダイス; ネジ切り盤; クランプ・バイス; 工業用ヤスリ; 開閉キー; 工業用ナイフ・カッター; 工具セット; 溶接機; 溶接ガン・プラズマカッター; ワイヤー・ケーブル関連工具; 作業灯; レンチ
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas: Máquinas para pulir; Yunques; Hachas; Ensambladoras para madera; Cinceles y escoplos; Herramientas para calafatear; Deshollinador; Compactadores; Compresores; Cepillos para suelos de cemento; Cortadores; Desbarbadores; Carretillas de carga; Taladros; Guía pasacables; Linternas y linternas frontales; Pistolas de engrase; Esmeriladoras; Empuñadura/mango; Martillos y mazos; Mezcladoras de mano motorizadas; Sopletes; Pistolas de calor; Taladradores y llaves de impacto; Vibradores industriales; Espejos de inspección; Escaleras y andamios; Tornos; Cambiadores de bombillas; Encendedores y cerillas; Cortadoras de troncos; Imanes de levantamiento; Herramientas para marcar; Herramientas de albañilería; Picos y azadones; Sensores y herramientas de medida; Fresadoras; Herramientas eléctricas y multifunción; Sacaclavos; Clavadoras y grapadoras; Desagües de filtros de aceite; Herramientas de pintura; Herramientas de recogida; Dobladoras; Limpiadores de tuberías; Escobillas para tubos; Cepilladoras; Cepillos carpinteros; Alicates; Desatascadores; Pulidoras; Ahoyadoras; Pies de cabra; Perforadoras y punzones; Raspadores y espátulas; Escariadores; Herramientas de remachado; Rebajadoras; Lijadoras; Bloques de lija; Caballetes de aserrar; Sierras; Destornilladores; Limadoras; Sacapuntas o afiladores; Llaves para tuercas; Cautines; Giramachos; Roscas; Máquinas de roscar; Abrazaderas y tornillos; Limas para herramientas; Llaves; Espátulas; Juegos de herramientas; Soldadores; Pistolas para soldar y herramientas para cortar por plasma; Herramientas para cables y alambres; Iluminación de trabajo; Llaves inglesas
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge: Sandstrahler; Ambosse; Äxte; Tischlerbänke; Schnitzwerkzeuge & Hohlmeißel; Stemmwerkzeuge; Kaminbürste; Bodenverdichter; Kompressoren; Betonbesen; Schneidegeräte; Entgrater; Rollwagen & Sackkarren; Bohrmaschinen; Einziehhilfen; Taschenlampen & Stirnlampen; Fettpressen; Schleifmaschinen; Griffe; Hämmer; Handmischmaschinen; Arbeitslampen; Heißluftpistole; Schlagschrauber; Industrievibratoren; Kontrollspiegel; Leitern & Gerüste; Drehmaschinen; Glühbirnenwechsler; Feuerzeuge & Streichhölzer; Holzspalter; Lasthebemagnete; Markierwerkzeuge; Bauwerkzeuge; Hacken & Spitzhacken; Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber; Mühlen; Multifunktionales Elektrowerkzeug; Nageleisen; Nagler & Tacker; Ölfilterabfluss; Malerwerkzeug; Müll- & Papierkrallen; Biegewerkzeuge für Rohre & Stangen; Rohrreiniger; Rohrbürsten; Elektrohobel; Hobel; Zangen; Saugglocken; Schleifer & Poliermaschinen; Lochschaufeln; Brecheisen; Locheisen & Ahlen; Kittmesser & -spachtel; Reibahlen; Nietwerkzeuge; Oberfräsen; Schwingschleifer; Schleifblöcke; Sägeböcke; Sägen; Schraubendreher; Stoßmaschinen; Schärfgeräte; Steckschlüssel; Lötkolben; Wasseranschluss-Nachschleifwerkzeuge; Gewindebohrer; Gewindeschneidmaschinen; Schraubzwingen & -stöcke; Werkzeugfeilen; Werkzeugschlüssel; Werkzeugmesser; Werkzeugsets; Schweißgeräte; Schweißwerkzeuge & Plasmaschneider; Handwerkzeuge für Drähte und Kabel; Arbeitsscheinwerfer; Schraubenschlüssel
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut: Hiekkapuhalluskoneet; Alasimet; Kirveet; Saumauskoneet; Taltat ja kaivertimet; Saumaustyökalut; Nuohousharjat; Maantiivistäjät; Kompressorit; Betoniharjat; Leikkurit; Jäysteenpoistajat; Siirtoalustat ja nokkakärryt; Porat; Sähkökaapelin vetojousi; Taskulamput ja otsalamput; Rasvapumput; Hiomalaitteet; Lukkopihdit; Vasarat; Käsikäyttöiset sähkösekoittimet; Metallipolttimet; Kuumailmapuhaltimet; Iskuvääntimet ja iskuporakoneet; Moottoritäristimet; Tarkastuspeilit; Tikkaat ja rakennustelineet; Sorvit; Lampunvaihtotyökalut; Sytyttimet ja tulitikut; Halkaisukoneet; Magneettinen kerääjä; Merkintävälineet; Muurarin työkalut; Kuokat ja hakut; Mittarit ja anturit; Jyrsinkoneet; Akku- ja sähkökäyttöiset monitoimityökalut; Naulan ulosvetäjät; Naulapistoolit ja naulaimet; Öljynsuodattimen putket; Maalaustyökalut; Poimintatyökalut; Putkentaivutuskoneet; Putkienpuhdistusaineet; Putkiharjat; Höyläkoneet; Höylät; Pihdit; Viemäripumput; Kiillotus- ja hiontalaitteet; Reikäkaivurit; Sorkkaraudat; Piikit ja naskalit; Kittiveitset ja lastat; Avartimet; Vetoniittityökalut; Yläjyrsimen terät; Hiomakoneet; Hiontatyynyt; Sahapukit; Sahat; Ruuvimeisselit; Pistohöylät; Teroittimet; Hylsyruuvitaltat; Juotoskolvit; Hanan pesän puhdistuslaitteet; Kierretapit ja -leuat; Kierteityskoneet; Ruuvipuristimet; Viilat; Avaimet; Työkaluveitset; Työkalusetit; Hitsauslaitteet; Hitsauspistoolit ja plasmaleikkurit; Käsikäyttöiset johto- ja kaapelityökalut; Työvalaisimet; Ruuviavaimet
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία: Φυσητήρες λειαντικού μέσου; Αμόνια; Τσεκούρια; Ξυλουργικοί σύνδεσμοι; Σμίλες & κοπίδια καμπύλης διατομής για σκάλισμα; Εργαλεία καλαφατίσματος; Βούρτσες καμινάδας; Συσκευές συμπίεσης; Συμπιεστές; Σκούπες σκυροδέματος; Κόπτες; Εργαλεία απόξεσης προεξοχών; Καρότσια μεταφοράς (ανεξάρτητα τροχοφορεία) & χειροκίνητα καρότσια; Τρυπάνια; Ατσαλίνες (ταινία) ηλεκτρολόγου; Φακοί & προβολείς; Πιστόλια γράσου; Λειαντήρες (Grinders); Λαβές; Σφυριά; Φορητοί ηλεκτρικοί μίκτες; Φλόγιστρα εργαλείων; Θερμικά πιστόλια; Κρουστικά κλειδιά & κρουστικοί οδηγοί; Δονητές για βιομηχανική χρήση; Καθρέφτες επιθεώρησης; Σκάλες & σκαλωσιές; Τόρνοι; Διατάξεις αλλαγής λαμπτήρων; Αναπτήρες & σπίρτα; Μηχανές σχισίματος κορμών; Μαγνητικές σκούπες; Εργαλεία σήμανσης; Εργαλεία τοιχοποιίας; Αξίνες & σκαπάνες; Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων; Φρέζες; Ηλεκτρικά εργαλεία πολλαπλών λειτουργιών; Αποσυρτήρες καρφιών; Εργαλεία ήλωσης & συρραπτικά; Αποχετεύσεις φίλτρου λαδιού; Εργαλεία βαφής; Εργαλεία παραλαβής; Καμπτήρες σωλήνων & ράβδων; Διατάξεις καθαρισμού σωλήνων & σωληνώσεων; Βούρτσες σωλήνων; Πλάνες; Εργαλεία λείανσης (Planes); Πένσα; Βεντούζες; Στίλβωτρα & εργαλεία στίλβωσης; Εκσκαφείς οπών για στύλους; Λοστοί; Διατρητήρες & τρυπητήρες; Σπάτουλες στόκου & ξύστρες; Γλύφανα; Εργαλεία ήλωσης; Εργαλεία δρομολόγησης; Λειαντήρες (Sanders); Τεμάχια λείανσης; Τρίποδες πριονισμού; Πριόνια; Κατσαβίδια; Διατάξεις διαμόρφωσης; Ακονιστήρια; Κατσαβίδια υποδοχών; Συσκευές συγκόλλησης (κολλητήρια); Υδραυλικά εργαλεία επανατοποθέτησης βρυσών; Κρουνοί (βρύσες) & μήτρες; Μηχανές σπειροτόμησης; Σφιγκτήρες & μέγγενες εργαλείων; Εργαλεία για λιμάρισμα; Κλειδιά ως εργαλεία; Μαχαίρια πολυ-εργαλεία; Σετ εργαλείων; Συσκευές συγκόλλησης; Πιστόλια συγκόλλησης & κόφτες πλάσματος; Εργαλεία χειρός για καλώδια & σύρματα; Φώτα εργασίας; Κλειδιά σύσφιγξης
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg: Sandblästrar; Städ; Yxor; Fogjärn för snickeriarbete; Snideriverktyg; Drevningsverktyg; Skorstensborstar; Kompaktorer; Kompressorer; Kvastar för betong; Skärare; Gradningsverktyg; Dollies och vagnar; Borrmaskiner; Dragfjädrar; Signallampor; Fettsprutor; Slipmaskiner; Grepp; Hammare; Mixerstavar; Blåslampor; Värmepistoler; Slagskruvdragare; Industriella vibratorer; Inspektionsspeglar; Stegar och plattformar; Svarvar; Glödlampsbytare; Tändare och tändstickor; Vedklyvar; Lyftmagneter; Markeringsverktyg; Murningsverktyg; Hackor och röjhackor; Mätverktyg och sensorer; Fräsmaskiner; Multifunktionsverktyg; Spikutdragare; Spikpistoler och häftpistoler; Dränering av oljefilter; Målarverktyg; Gripverktyg; Böjverktyg; Rörrengöring; Rörborstar; Hyvelmaskiner; Hyvlar; Tänger; Avloppsrensare; Poleringsverktyg; Stolphålsgrävare; Kofötter; Stansapparater och sylar; Färgskrapor och spackelknivar; Brotschar; Nitverktyg; Fräsverktyg; Slipmaskiner; Block för sandpapper; Sågbockar; Sågar; Skruvmejslar; Kipphyvlar; Slipverktyg; Muttermejslar; Lödkolvar; Verktyg för byte av ventilsäte; Stansset; Trådningsmaskiner; Skruvtvingar; Verktygsfilar; Verktygsnycklar; Verktygsknivar; Verktygsset; Svetsare; Svetsverktyg; Handverktyg för kablar; Arbetsbelysning; Skiftnycklar
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati: Pjeskarilice; Nakovnji; Sjekire; Stolarski spojnici; Dlijeta za rezbarenje; Alati za brtvljenje; Četke za dimnjak; Kompaktori; Kompresori; Metle za beton; Rezači; Skidači srha; Kolica i ručna kolica; Bušilice; Traka za provlačenje električnih vodova; Ručne svjetiljke i naglavna svjetla; Pištolji za podmazivanje; Brusilice; Drške; Čekići; Ručne električne miješalice; Svjetiljke; Letlampe; Udarni ključevi i odvijači; Industrijski vibratori; Kontrolna ogledala; Ljestve i skele; Tokarilice; Mjenjači žarulja; Upaljači i šibice; Cjepači drva; Magnetske metle; Alati za označavanje; Zidarski alati; Motike i pijuci; Mjerni alati i senzori; Strojevi za glodanje; Višenamjenski električni alati; Alati za vađenje čavala; Zakivači i klamerice; Odvodi filtra za ulje; Alati za bojanje; Alati za skupljanje; Savijači cijevi i šipki; Čistači za cijevi; Četke za cijevi; Blanjalice; Blanje; Kliješta; Odčepljivači; Alati za poliranje i laštenje; Kopači rupa za stupove; Poluge; Probijači rupa i šila; Noževi i strugalice za kit; Razvrtala; Alati za zakivanje; Alati za glodanje utora; Alati za brušenje pijeskom; Brusni blokovi; Stalci za piljenje; Pile; Odvijači; Alati za oblikovanje; Oštrila; Nasadni nastavci; Lemilice; Alat za namještanje sjedišta slavine; Nareznice i ureznici; Strojevi za rezanje navoja; Stege i škripci za alate; Rašpe za alat; Ključevi za alat; Noževi za alat; Kompleti alata; Zavarivači; Pištolji za zavarivanje i plazma rezači; Ručni alati za žice i kabele; Radna svjetla; Alatni ključevi